District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.151

Repealed

Verification no longer required; penalty for misstatement of fact.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, ch. 269, § 151
Sept. 3, 1963, 77 Stat. 140, Pub. L. 88-111, § 1(13)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 441(f), 32 DCR 4450
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(yy), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.151.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.50.
1973 Ed., § 29-959.